Arkansas, session 2025, SB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

12-29-102. Inmates denied participation in furlough programs.
A person who is convicted of any of the following offenses shall be
ineligible to participate in any meritorious furlough program conducted by or
for the Division of Correction:
(1) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(2) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(3) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(4) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(4)(5) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(5)(6) Any other offense concerning sexual offenses under § 5-
14-101 et seq.;
(6)(7) An offense concerning sexual exploitation of children
under the Arkansas Protection of Children Against Exploitation Act of 1979, §
5-27-301 et seq.;
(7)(8) An offense concerning use of children in sexual
performances under § 5-27-401 et seq.; or
*CEB124*
02/10/2025 4:35:03 PM CEB124

SB214
(8)(9) Stalking, § 5-71-229.



































02/10/2025 4:35:03 PM CEB124